California statutes. Corporations Code
 has no material financial relationship with the benefit corporation or any of its subsidiaries and that satisfies both of the following requirements:

(A) Not more than one-third of the members of the governing body of the entity are representatives of any of the following:

(i) Associations of businesses operating in a specific industry, the performance of whose members is measured by the standard.

(ii) Businesses from a specific industry or an association of businesses in that industry.

(iii) Businesses whose performance is assessed against the standard.

(B) The entity is not materially financed by an association or business described in subparagraph (A).

(3) The standard is developed by an entity that does both of the following:

(A) Accesses necessary and appropriate expertise to assess overall corporate social and environmental performance.

(B) Uses a balanced multistakeholder approach, including a public comment period of at least 30 days to develop the standard.

(4) All of the following information regarding the standard is publicly available:

(A) The criteria considered when measuring the overall social and environmental performance of a business.

(B) The relative weightings assigned to the criteria described in subparagraph (A).

(C) The identity of the directors, officers, any material owners, and the governing body of the entity that developed, and controls revisions to, the standard.

(D) The process by which revisions to the standard and changes to the membership of the governing body described in subparagraph (C) are made.

(E) An accounting of the sources of financial support for the entity, with sufficient detail to disclose any relationships that could reasonably be considered to present a potential conflict of interest.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 728, Sec. 1.   (AB 361)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

14602.

A benefit corporation shall be formed in accordance with Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 200) of Division 1 except that the articles shall also state that the corporation is a benefit corporation and shall identify any specific public benefit adopted pursuant to Section 14610.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 728, Sec. 1.   (AB 361)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

14603.

(a) A corporation may become a benefit corporation under this part by amending the corporation’s articles so that the articles contain a statement that the corporation is a benefit corporation. The amendment shall not be effective unless it is adopted by at least the minimum status vote. If the amendment is adopted, a shareholder of the corporation may, by complying with Chapter 13 (commencing with Section 1300) of Division 1, require the corporation to purchase at
 their fair market value the shares owned by the shareholder which are dissenting shares as defined in subdivision (b) of Section 1300 in accordance with the procedures in that chapter, as if the adoption of the amendment were a reorganization to which that chapter applies.

(b) If a corporation that is not a benefit corporation is a constituent corporation in a merger reorganization or is the acquired corporation in an exchange reorganization, and the surviving corporation in the merger reorganization is to be a benefit corporation or the articles of the acquired corporation are to be amended in the exchange reorganization to provide that it will be a benefit corporation, then the reorganization shall not be effective unless the reorganization is approved by the corporation or domestic other business entity by at least the minimum status vote.

(c) If a domestic other business
 entity is a party to a merger reorganization and the surviving corporation in the reorganization is to be a benefit corporation, then the reorganization shall not be effective unless the reorganization is approved by the domestic other business entity by at least the minimum status vote.

(d) If a domestic other business entity is the converting entity (subdivision (d) of Section 1150) in a conversion in which the converted corporation (subdivision (a) of Section 1150) is a benefit corporation, the conversion shall not be effective unless the conversion is approved by the domestic other business entity by at least the minimum status vote.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 728, Sec. 1.   (AB 361)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

14604.

(a) A benefit corporation may terminate its status as a benefit corporation and cease to be subject to this part by amending the corporation’s articles to delete the provision required by Section 14602. The amendment shall not be effective unless the amendment is adopted by at least the minimum status vote. If the amendment is adopted, a shareholder of the corporation may, by complying with Chapter 13 (commencing with Section 1300) of Division 1, require the
 corporation to purchase at their fair market value the shares owned by the shareholder which are dissenting shares as defined in subdivision (b) of Section 1300 in accordance with the procedures in that chapter.

(b) If a reorganization (Section 181) would have the effect of terminating the status of a corporation as a benefit corporation, the reorganization shall not be effective unless the reorganization is approved by at least the minimum status vote.

(c) If a benefit corporation is the converting corporation (Section 1150) in a conversion (Section 161.9), the conversion shall not be effective unless the conversion is approved by at least the minimum status vote.

(d) A sale, lease, conveyance, exchange, transfer, or other disposition of all or substantially all of the assets of a benefit corporation, unless the
 transaction is in the usual and ordinary course of business of the benefit corporation, shall not be effective unless the transaction is approved by at least the minimum status vote. If the transaction is approved, a shareholder of the corporation may, by complying with Chapter 13 (commencing with Section 1300) of Division 1, require the corporation to purchase at their fair market value the shares owned by the shareholder which are dissenting shares as defined in subdivision (b) of Section 1300 in accordance with the procedures in that chapter, as if the transaction were a reorganization to which that chapter applies.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 728, Sec. 1.   (AB 361)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Corporate Purposes [14610. - 14610.]

14610.

(a) A benefit corporation shall have the purpose of creating general public benefit. This purpose is in addition to, and may be a limitation on, the corporation’s purpose under Section 206 and any specific purpose set forth in its articles in accordance with subdivision (b).

(b) In addition to the provisions required by Section 202, the articles of incorporation of a benefit corporation shall contain the following statement: “This corporation is a benefit corporation.” Notwithstanding subdivision (b) of Section 202, the articles of a
 benefit corporation may identify one or more specific public benefits that shall be the purpose or purposes of the benefit corporation. The identification of a specific public benefit under this subdivision does not limit the obligation of a benefit corporation to create general public benefit.

(c) The creation of general and specific public benefit as provided in subdivisions (a) and (b) shall be deemed to be in the best interests of the benefit corporation.

(d) A benefit corporation may amend its articles to add, amend, or delete the identification of a specific public benefit that shall be the purpose of the benefit corporation to create. The amendment shall not be effective unless the amendment is adopted by at least the minimum status vote.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 728, Sec. 1.   (AB 361)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Accountability [14620. - 14623.]

14620.

(a) A director shall perform the duties of a director including duties as a member of any committee of the board upon which the director may serve, in good faith, in a manner the director believes to be in the best interests of the benefit corporation and with that care, including reasonable inquiry, as an ordinarily prudent person in a like position would use under similar circumstances.

(b) In discharging their respective duties, and in considering the best interests of the benefit corporation, the board of directors, committees of
 the board, and individual directors of a benefit corporation shall consider the impacts of any action or proposed action upon all of the following:

(1) The shareholders of the benefit corporation.

(2) The employees and workforce of the benefit corporation and its subsidiaries and suppliers.

(3) The interests of customers of the benefit corporation as beneficiaries of the general or specific public benefit purposes of the benefit corporation.

(4) Community and societal considerations, including those of any community in which offices or facilities of the benefit corporation or its subsidiaries or suppliers are located.

(5) The local and global environment.

(6) The short-term and long-term interests of the benefit corporation, including benefits that may accrue to the benefit corporation from its long-term plans and the possibility that these
 interests may be best served by retaining control of the benefit corporation rather than selling or transferring control to another entity.

(7) The ability of the benefit corporation to accomplish its general, and any specific, public benefit purpose.

(c) In discharging their respective duties, the persons described in subdivision (b) may consider any of the following:

(1) The resources, intent, and conduct, including past, stated, and potential conduct, of any person seeking to acquire control of the corporation.

(2) Any other pertinent factors or the interests of any other person or group.

(d) In discharging their respective duties, the persons described in subdivision (a) shall not be required to give priority to any particular factor or the interests of any particular person or group referred to in subdivision (b) or (c) over any other factor or the interests of any
 other person or group unless the benefit corporation has stated its intention to give priority to a specific public benefit purpose identified in the articles.

(e) In performing the duties of a director, a director shall be entitled to rely on information, opinions, reports, or statements, including financial statements and other financial data, in each case prepared or presented by any of the following:

(1) One or more officers or employees of the benefit corporation whom the director believes to be reliable and competent in the matters presented.

(2) Counsel, independent accountants, or other persons as to matters that the director believes to be within those persons’ professional or expert competence.

(3) A committee of the board upon which the director does not serve, as to matters within its designated authority, which committee the director believes to merit confidence, so long as, in any of
 those cases, the director acts in good faith, after reasonable inquiry when the need therefor is indicated by the circumstances and without knowledge that would cause that reliance to be unwarranted.

(f) A director shall not be liable for monetary damages under this part for any failure of the benefit corporation to create a general or specific public benefit.

(g) A person who performs the duties of a director in accordance with this part shall not be liable for monetary damages for any alleged failure to discharge the person’s obligations as a director.

(h) In addition to the limitations provided in subdivisions (f) and (g), the liability of a director for monetary damages may be eliminated or limited in a benefit corporation’s articles to the extent provided in paragraph (10) of subdivision (a) of Section 204.

(i) A director shall not have a fiduciary duty to a person that is a beneficiary of the
 general or specific public benefit purposes of a benefit corporation arising from the status of the person as a beneficiary.

(j) A director of a foreign corporation that is subject to Section 2115 shall not be subject to Section 309 and shall be subject instead to this section if the director of the foreign corporation is subject to duties under its articles of incorporation, bylaws, or the law of its jurisdiction of incorporation similar to the duties of directors under this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 728, Sec. 1.   (AB 361)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

14621.

(a) The board of directors of a benefit corporation shall prepare for inclusion in the annual benefit report to shareholders required by Section 14630, a statement indicating whether, in the opinion of the board of directors, the benefit corporation failed to pursue its general, and any specific, public benefit purpose in all material respects during the period covered by the report.

(b) If, in the opinion of the board of directors, the benefit corporation failed to pursue its general, and any specific, public benefit purpose, the
 statement required by subdivision (a) shall include a description of the ways in which the benefit corporation failed to pursue its general, and any specific, public benefit purpose.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 728, Sec. 1.   (AB 361)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

14622.

(a) Each officer of a benefit corporation shall consider the interests and factors described in Section 14620 in the manner provided in that section when either of the following applies:

(1) The officer has discretion to act with respect to a matter.

(2) It reasonably appears to the officer that the matter may have a material effect on any of the following:

(A) The creation of a general or specific public benefit by the benefit corporation.

(B) Any of
 the interests or factors referred to in subdivision (b) of Section 14620.

(b) The consideration by an officer of interests and factors in the manner described in subdivision (a) shall not constitute a violation of the duties of the officer.

(c) An officer shall not be liable for monetary damages under this part for any of the following:

(1) Any action taken as an officer if the officer performed the duties of the position in compliance with this section.

(2) Any failure of the benefit corporation to create a general or specific public benefit.

(d) An officer shall not have a fiduciary duty to a person that is a beneficiary of the general or specific public benefit purposes of a benefit corporation arising from the status of the person as a beneficiary.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 728, Sec. 1.   (AB 361)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

14623.

(a) No person may bring an action or assert a claim against a benefit corporation or its directors or officers under this chapter except in a benefit enforcement proceeding.

(b) A benefit enforcement proceeding may be commenced or maintained only as follows:

(1) Directly by the benefit corporation.

(2) Derivatively by any of the following:

(A) A shareholder.

(B) A director.

(C) A person or group
 of persons that owns beneficially or of record 5 percent or more of the equity interests in an entity of which the benefit corporation is a subsidiary.

(D) Other persons as have been specified in the articles or bylaws of the benefit corporation.

(c) A benefit corporation shall not be liable for monetary damages under this part for any failure of the benefit corporation to create a general or specific public benefit.

(d) If the court in a benefit enforcement proceeding finds that a failure to comply with this part was without justification, the court may award an amount sufficient to reimburse the plaintiff for the reasonable expenses incurred by the plaintiff, including attorney’s fees and expenses, in connection with the benefit enforcement proceeding.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 728, Sec. 1.   (AB 361)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4. Transparency [14630. - 14631.]

14630.

(a) A benefit corporation shall deliver to each shareholder an annual benefit report including all of the following:

(1) A narrative description of all of the following:

(A) The process and rationale for selecting the third-party standard used to prepare the benefit report.

(B) The ways in which the benefit corporation pursued a general public benefit during the applicable year and the extent to which that general public benefit was created.

(C) The ways in which the benefit corporation pursued any specific public benefit that the articles state it is the purpose of the benefit corporation to create and the extent to which that specific public benefit was created.

(D) Any circumstances that have hindered the creation by the benefit corporation of a general or specific public benefit.

(2) An assessment of the overall social and environmental performance of the benefit corporation, prepared in accordance with a third-party standard applied consistently with any application of that standard in prior benefit reports or accompanied by an explanation of the reasons for any
 inconsistent application. The assessment does not need to be audited or certified by a third party.

(3) The name of each person that owns 5 percent or more of the outstanding shares of the benefit corporation, either beneficially, to the extent known to the benefit corporation without independent investigation, or of record.

(4) The statement required by Section 14621.

(5) A statement of any connection between the entity that established the third-party standard, or its directors, officers, or material owners, and the benefit corporation, or its directors, officers, and material owners, including any financial or governance relationship that might materially affect the credibility of the objective assessment of the third-party standard.

(b) The benefit
 report shall be sent annually to each shareholder within 120 days following the end of the fiscal year of the benefit corporation or at the same time that the benefit corporation delivers any other annual report to its shareholders.

(c) A benefit corporation shall post all of its benefit reports on the public portion of its Internet Web site, if any, except that the compensation paid to directors and any financial or proprietary information included in the benefit report may be omitted from the benefit report as posted on the Internet Web site.

(d) (1) If a benefit corporation does not have an Internet Web site, the benefit corporation shall provide a copy of its most recent benefit report, without charge, to any person that requests a copy.

(2) The benefit corporation may omit any proprietary
 or financial information, including, but not limited to, compensation paid to directors, from the copy of a benefit report that the benefit corporation provides pursuant to paragraph (1).

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 728, Sec. 1.   (AB 361)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

14631.

All certificates representing shares of a benefit corporation shall contain, in addition to any other statements required by the General Corporation Law (Division 1 (commencing with Section 100)), the following conspicuous language on the face of the certificate:

“This entity is a benefit corporation organized under Part 13 (commencing with Section 14600) of Division 3 of Title 1 of the California Corporations Code.”

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 728, Sec. 1.   (AB 361)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------



  PART 14. Retail Grocery Firms and Retail Drug Firms [14700. - 14707.]

14700.

(a) No person shall acquire, directly or indirectly, any voting securities or assets of a retail grocery firm or retail drug firm unless both parties give, or in the case of a tender offer, the acquiring party gives, written notice to the Attorney General in accordance with this part.

(b) For purposes of this part, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Acquiring party” means a person by whom or on whose behalf the merger or other acquisition of control is to be effected and is either of the following:

(A) Is required to provide notice of the merger or acquisition to the Federal Trade Commission or the United States
 Department of Justice pursuant to the federal Hart-Scott-Rodino Antitrust Improvements Act of 1976 (15 U.S.C. Sec. 18a).

(B) Is acquiring more than a total of 20 retail drug firms or retail grocery firms.

(2) “Retail drug firm” means a person, as defined in Section 18 of the Labor Code, including a proprietorship, joint venture, corporate officer or executive, that has one or more businesses or establishments located within the state and is identified as a retail business or establishment in the North American Industry Classification System within the retail trade category 45611. 

(3) “Retail grocery firm” means a person, as defined in Section 18 of the Labor Code, including a proprietorship, joint venture, corporate officer or executive, that has one or more businesses or establishments located within the state and
 is identified as a retail business or establishment in the North American Industry Classification System within the retail trade category 44511 and 455211.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 457, Sec. 2.   (AB 853)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

14701.

(a) The written notice shall be filed with the Attorney General no less than 180 days before the acquisition is made effective. The notice shall be made under oath or affirmation, and shall comply with the requirements of subdivision (c).

(b) If any transaction requiring written notice pursuant to this subdivision commences before the effective date of this section, the written notice shall be given to the Attorney General within 30 days before the transaction is made effective. Upon receiving notice, the Attorney General has 180 days to evaluate the transaction, during which time the effective date of the transaction shall be tolled. If any material change occurs in the facts set forth in the written notice filed with the Attorney General, an amendment setting
 forth the change and copies of all documents and other material relevant to the change shall be filed with the Attorney General within two business days after the amendment is made by, or provided to, the acquiring party.

(c) The notice required to be given to the Attorney General shall comply with either of the following:

(1) If the acquiring party is required to file notice with the Federal Trade Commission or the United States Department of Justice pursuant to the Hart-Scott-Rodino Antitrust Improvements Act of 1976 (15 U.S.C. Sec. 18a), the notice shall contain the same form and additional documentary material required under that act and any implementing regulations under that act.

(2) If the acquiring party is not required to file notice with the Federal Trade Commission or the United States Department of
 Justice, as specified in paragraph (1), the notice shall contain all of the following information:

(A) The name and address of each acquiring party and a report of the nature of its business operations during the past five years or for a lesser period if the person and their predecessors have been in existence less than five years.

(B) An informative description of the business intended to be done by the person and the person’s subsidiaries, including, but not limited to, documents concerning its business or corporate structure, governance, or management.

(C) A list of all individuals who are or have been selected to become directors or executive officers or who perform or will perform functions appropriate to the positions.

(D) The source, nature, and
 amount of the consideration used or to be used in effecting the merger or other acquisition of control, a description of any transaction in which funds were or are to be obtained, including any pledge of the drug or grocery retail firm’s stock or the stock of any of its subsidiaries or controlling affiliates, and the identity of persons furnishing the consideration. If a source of the consideration is a loan made in the lender’s ordinary course of business, the identity of the lender shall remain confidential upon request of the person filing the statement.

(E) Fully audited financial information as to the earnings and financial condition of each acquiring party for the preceding five fiscal years or for a lesser period if the acquiring party and its predecessors have been in existence for less than five years, and similar unaudited information as of a date not earlier than 90 days before the written notice.

(F) Any plans or proposals that an acquiring party may have to liquidate the retail grocery or retail drug firms, to sell its assets or merge or consolidate it with any person, or to make any other material change in its business or corporate structure or management.

(G) The information required to assess the competitive effects of the proposed acquisition, giving particular attention to the effects on the proposed chain retail grocery store acquisition on consumers, including, but not limited to, consumer choice, food pricing, access to food, and food deserts, and factors affecting the supply of experienced grocery workers, including wages, benefits, and unemployment and chain retail pharmacy on patients, including, but not limited to, patient choice, medicine pricing, access to medications, and factors affecting the supply of licensed pharmacists, pharmacy technicians, and
 pharmacists-in-charge.

(H) Information required to assess the economic and community impact of any planned divestiture or store closures, including, but not limited to, the impact on food deserts, food supply, economic mobility, unemployment, and small businesses.

(d) The Attorney General shall charge the acquiring party a filing fee for the cost to the Attorney General to receive, review, and analyze any notice under this section, which shall not exceed the reasonable regulatory costs to the Attorney General incident to performing its administrative duties under this section. The fee shall be based on the size of the transaction as of the date of the filing of the notice, but shall not exceed .00045 of the dollar amount of the combined sales of the parties to the merger or acquisition for the fiscal year prior to the filing of the notice.

(e) The Attorney General may use the notice, documents, and information disclosed under this section in a judicial action in state or federal court or an administrative action involving the merger or acquisition.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 41, Sec. 20.   (SB 164)   Effective June 29, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

14702.

(a) The Attorney General may adopt regulations to effectuate this part that are necessary or appropriate for the protection of workers, consumers, and the public interest.

(b) The regulations may specify exemptions from the notice requirement for acquisitions that, by virtue of the size, business volume, or number of employees are unlikely to materially affect competitive markets in California.

(c) The regulations may authorize the Attorney General to request additional materials.

(d) The regulations may authorize adjustments in the filing fee, based on the size of the transaction, subject to the maximum amount set
 forth in subdivision (d) of Section 14701.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 457, Sec. 2.   (AB 853)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

14703.

If the Attorney General determines that they cannot complete an evaluation of the competitive effects of the acquisition before the parties intend to consummate the acquisition, the Attorney General may seek an order from the Superior Court of the County of Sacramento temporarily staying or preliminarily enjoining the acquisition for such time as is reasonably necessary for the Attorney General to complete the analysis.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 457, Sec. 2.   (AB 853)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

14704.

(a) For acquisitions to which Section 18a of Title 15 of the United States Code applies, the Attorney General shall consider the extent to which information required to be submitted to the United States Department of Justice and the Federal Trade Commission may satisfy some or all of the need to carry out the applicable state laws. Any information that has been submitted to the Attorney General under provisions of federal law rendering them confidential shall be deemed to be confidential under California law.

(b) The submitting party may designate information submitted pursuant to this part as privileged or confidential. If the Attorney General disputes any claim of privilege or confidentiality, the Attorney General may give notice to the
 submitting party of that fact and give the submitting party, or other person interested in the claim of privilege or confidentiality, an opportunity to seek an order from the Superior Court of the County of Sacramento requiring the Attorney General not to make the designated information public. Except for information that the Attorney General agrees is privileged or confidential, or the court so determines, the information shall be available to the public under the California Public Records Act (Division 10 (commencing with Section 7920.000) of Title 1 of the Government Code).

(c) The Attorney General may disclose any notice and information filed under this part to the attorney general of any other state, the Federal Trade Commission, the United States Department of Justice, or to another state agency, as long as that other state attorney general, state agency, or federal agency operates under a law substantially similar to this statute to
 guarantee the privileged or confidential nature of the notice and information disclosed.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 457, Sec. 2.   (AB 853)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

14706.

Nothing in this section or any other law shall preclude the Attorney General or any person from bringing an action pursuant to this article or any other law to enjoin or seek divestiture of assets or ownership interests obtained in a completed acquisition or otherwise to restore competition.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 457, Sec. 2.   (AB 853)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

14707.

(a) The failure to provide written notice, amendment to written notice, or other material required to be provided pursuant to this part shall be a violation of this part.

(b) In addition to any legal remedies the Attorney General may have, the Attorney General shall be entitled to injunctive relief and other equitable remedies a court deems appropriate for a violation of this part, shall be entitled to recover its attorney’s fees and costs incurred in remedying each violation, and shall be entitled to civil penalties of up to twenty thousand dollars ($20,000) for each day of noncompliance with the requirements of Section 14700.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 457, Sec. 2.   (AB 853)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

TITLE 2. PARTNERSHIPS [15800. - 16962.]



CHAPTER 4. Process Agents for Certain Foreign Corporations [15800. - 15800.]

15800.

(a) Every partnership, other than a foreign limited partnership, subject to Chapter 4.5 (commencing with Section 15900), or a commercial or banking partnership established and transacting business in a place outside the United States, that is domiciled without this state and has no regular place of business within this state, shall, within 40 days from the time it commences to do business in this state, file a statement in the office of the Secretary of State in accordance with Section 16309 designating some natural person or corporation as the agent of the partnership upon whom process issued by authority of or under any law of this state directed against the partnership may be served. A copy of the designation, duly certified by the Secretary of State, is sufficient evidence of the appointment.

(b) The process may be served in the manner provided in subdivision (b) of Section 16310 on the person so designated, or, in the event that no person has been designated, or if the agent designated for the service of process is a natural person and cannot be found with due diligence at the address stated in the designation, or if the agent is a corporation and no person can be found with due diligence to whom the delivery authorized by subdivision (b) of Section 16310 may be made for the purpose of delivery to the corporate agent, or if the agent designated is no longer authorized to act, then service may be made by personal delivery to the Secretary of State, Assistant Secretary of State, or a Deputy Secretary of State of the process, together with a written statement signed by the party to the action seeking the service, or by the party’s attorney, setting forth the last known address of the partnership and a service fee as set forth in Section
 12197 of the Government Code. The Secretary of State shall immediately give notice of the service to the partnership by forwarding the process to it by registered mail, return receipt requested, at the address given in the written statement.

(c) Service on the person designated, or personal delivery of the process and statement of address together with a service fee as set forth in Section 12197 of the Government Code to the Secretary of State, Assistant Secretary of State, or a Deputy Secretary of State, pursuant to this section is a valid service on the partnership. The partnership so served shall appear within 30 days after service on the person designated or within 30 days after delivery of the process to the Secretary of State, Assistant Secretary of State, or a Deputy Secretary of State.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 200, Sec. 17.   (AB 1521)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 4.5. Uniform Limited Partnership Act of 2008 [15900. - 15912.07.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [15900. - 15901.17.]

15900.

This chapter may be cited as the Uniform Limited Partnership Act of 2008.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 495, Sec. 20.   Effective January 1, 2007.   Section operative January 1, 2008, pursuant to Section 15912.04.)
-------------------------------------------

15901.02.

In this chapter, the following terms have the following meanings:

(a) “Acknowledged” means that an instrument is either of the following:

(1) Formally acknowledged as provided in Article 3 (commencing with Section 1180) of Chapter 4 of Title 4 of Part 4 of Division 2 of the Civil Code.

(2) Executed to include substantially the following wording preceding the signature: “It is hereby declared that I am the person who executed this instrument, which execution is my act and deed. Any certificate of acknowledgment taken without this state
 before a notary public or a judge or clerk of a court of record having an official seal need not be further authenticated.”

(b) “Certificate of limited partnership” means the certificate required by Section 15902.01. The term includes the certificate as amended or restated.

(c) “Contribution,” except in the phrase “right of contribution,” means any benefit provided by a person to a limited partnership in order to become a partner or in the person’s capacity as a partner.

(d) “Debtor in bankruptcy” means a person that is the subject of either of the following:

(1) An order for relief under Title 11 of the United States Code or a comparable order under a
 successor statute of general application.

(2) A comparable order under federal, state, or foreign law governing insolvency.

(e) “Designated office” means either of the following:

(1) With respect to a limited partnership, the office that the limited partnership is required to designate and maintain under Section 15901.14.

(2) With respect to a foreign limited partnership, its principal office.

(f) “Distribution” means a transfer of money or other property from a limited partnership to a partner in the partner’s capacity as a partner or to a transferee on account of a transferable interest owned
 by the transferee.

(g) “Domestic corporation” means a corporation formed under the laws of this state.

(h) “Electronic transmission by the partnership” means a communication that meets both of the following requirements:

(1) It is delivered by any of the following means:

(A) Facsimile transmission or electronic mail when directed to the facsimile number or electronic mail address, respectively, for the recipient on the record with the partnership.

(B) Posting on an electronic message board or other electronic database, that the partnership has designated for the communication, together with a
 separate notice to the recipient of the posting, which shall be validly delivered upon the later of either the posting or delivery of the separate notice thereof.

(C) Other means of electronic communication.

(2) It is to a recipient that has provided an unrevoked consent to the use of the means of transmission used by the partnership in the electronic transmission.

(i) “Electronic transmission to the partnership” means a communication that meets both of the following requirements:

(1) It is delivered by any of the following means:

(A) Facsimile communication or other electronic mail when directed to the
 facsimile number or electronic mail address, respectively, that the partnership has provided from time to time to the partners for sending communications to the partnership.

(B) Posting on an electronic message board or electronic database that the partnership has designated for the communication. A transmission shall have been validly delivered upon the posting.

(C) Other means of electronic communication.

(2) It is a communication as to which the partnership has placed in effect reasonable measures to verify that the sender is the partner purporting to send the transmission, either in person or by proxy.

(j) “Foreign limited liability limited partnership” means a foreign limited
 partnership whose general partners have limited liability for the obligations of the foreign limited partnership.

(k) “Foreign limited partnership” means a partnership formed under the laws of a jurisdiction other than this state and required by those laws to have one or more general partners and one or more limited partners. The term includes a foreign limited liability limited partnership.

(l) “Foreign other business entity” means an other business entity formed under the laws of any state other than this state or under the laws of a foreign country.

(m) “General partner” means:

(1) With respect to a limited partnership, a person to whom either of the
 following applies:

(A) The person becomes a general partner under Section 15904.01.

(B) The person was a general partner in a limited partnership when the limited partnership became subject to this chapter under subdivision (a) or (b) of Section 15912.06.

(2) With respect to a foreign limited partnership, a person that has rights, powers, and obligations similar to those of a general partner in a limited partnership.
